Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1814.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 145C.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1c. new text end new text begin Emergency medical services provider. new text end new text begin "Emergency medical services provider" means: new text end new text begin (1) an ambulance service licensed under chapter 144E; new text end new text begin (2) a medical response unit as defined in section 144E.275, subdivision 1; new text end new text begin (3) an emergency medical responder as defined in section 144E.001, subdivision 6; or new text end new text begin (4) ambulance service personnel as defined in section 144E.001, subdivision 3a. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 145C.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7b. new text end new text begin Nonopioid directive. new text end new text begin "Nonopioid directive" means a written instrument that includes one or more instructions that a patient must not be administered an opioid by a health professional or be offered a prescription for an opioid by a prescriber. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 145C.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7c. new text end new text begin Prescriber. new text end new text begin "Prescriber" means an individual who is authorized by section 148.235; 151.01, subdivision 23; or 151.37 to prescribe prescription drugs. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 145C.17, is amended to read: 145C.17 OPIOID INSTRUCTIONS ENTERED INTO HEALTH RECORD. At the request of the patient or health care agent, a health care provider shall enter into the patient's health care record any instructions relating to administering, dispensing, or prescribing an opioid.new text begin A health care provider presented with a nonopioid directive executed by or on behalf of a patient must include the nonopioid directive in the patient's health care record. A health care provider receiving notice of revocation of a patient's nonopioid directive must note the revocation in the patient's health care record.new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [145C.18] NONOPIOID DIRECTIVE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Execution. new text end new text begin A patient with the capacity to do so may execute a nonopioid directive on the patient's own behalf. A patient's health care agent may execute a nonopioid directive on behalf of the patient. A nonopioid directive must include one or more instructions that the patient must not be administered an opioid by a health professional or be offered a prescription for an opioid by a prescriber. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Revocation. new text end new text begin A patient who executed a nonopioid directive on the patient's own behalf may revoke the nonopioid directive at any time and in any manner in which the patient is able to communicate an intent to revoke the nonopioid directive. A patient's health care agent may revoke the nonopioid directive executed on behalf of a patient by executing a written, dated statement of revocation and by providing notice of the revocation to the patient's health care provider. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Compliance with nonopioid directive; exception. new text end new text begin (a) Except as specified in paragraph (b), prescribers and health professionals must comply with a nonopioid directive executed under this section. new text end new text begin (b) A prescriber or a health professional acting on the order of a prescriber may administer an opioid to a patient with a nonopioid directive if: new text end new text begin (1) the patient is being treated in a hospital setting or is being treated in a setting outside a hospital in emergency circumstances; and new text end new text begin (2) in the prescriber's professional opinion, it is medically necessary to administer an opioid to the patient in order to treat the patient. new text end new text begin If an opioid is administered according to this paragraph to a patient with a nonopioid directive, the prescriber must ensure that the patient is provided with information on substance use disorder services. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Immunities. new text end new text begin Except as otherwise provided by law, the following persons or entities are not subject to criminal prosecution, civil liability, or professional disciplinary action for failing to prescribe, administer, or dispense an opioid to a patient with a nonopioid directive or, for the inadvertent administration of an opioid to a patient with a nonopioid directive, if the act or failure to act was performed reasonably and in good faith: new text end new text begin (1) a health professional whose scope of practice includes prescribing, administering, or dispensing a controlled substance; new text end new text begin (2) an employee of a health professional described in clause (1); new text end new text begin (3) a health care facility or an employee of a health care facility; or new text end new text begin (4) an emergency medical services provider. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Nonopioid directive form. new text end new text begin The commissioner of health must develop a nonopioid directive form for use by patients and health care agents to communicate to health professionals and prescribers that a patient with a nonopioid directive must not be administered an opioid or offered a prescription for an opioid. The commissioner must include on the nonopioid directive form instructions for how to revoke a nonopioid directive and other information the commissioner deems relevant. The commissioner must post the form on the Department of Health website. new text end